__1st_try_roman_lexica__/adj.lexc
!!!adj.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +Adj +Comp +Supr +Nom

LEXICON Root
AdjPrefix;
Adj;

LEXICON AdjPrefix
+Neg:na^ Adj;
+Neg:by^ Adj;_

LEXICON AdjInf
+Adj:0 #;
!Comparative and Superlative
+Adj+Comp:^tr #;
+Adj+Supr:^tryn #;
!Derivational morphology
+Adj+Nom:^y #; ! abstract nouns
+Adj+Nom:^an #;
+Adj+Nom:^a #;
!Pronominal enclitics
+Adj+Poss+1P+Sg:^m #;
+Adj+Poss+2P+Sg:^t #;
+Adj+Poss+3P+Sg:^š #;
+Adj+Poss+1P+Pl:^man #;
+Adj+Poss+2P+Pl:^tan #;
+Adj+Poss+3P+Pl:^šan #;
!Inferred
+Adj:^trm #;
+Adj:^atan #;
+Adj:^yšan #;
+Adj:^tr #;
+Adj:^y_aš #;
+Adj:^any #;
+Adj:^ea #;
+Adj:^trš #;
+Adj:^ytan #;
+Adj:^t #;
+Adj:^ay_aš #;
+Adj:^yn #;
+Adj:^ym #;
+Adj:^yy #;
+Adj:^y_tr #;
+Adj:^am #;
+Adj:^yt #;
+Adj:^trynš #;
+Adj:^ay #;
+Adj:^y_am #;
+Adj:^e #;
+Adj:^aš #;
+Adj:^at #;
+Adj:^try #;
+Adj:^yš #;
+Adj:^mnd #;
+Adj:^trnd #;
+Adj:^yman #;

LEXICON Adj
zban	AdjInf;
bazāwrde	AdjInf;
ħŕyŕt_jw	AdjInf;
jft	AdjInf;
parlmany	AdjInf;
şqyr	AdjInf;
drwn_bxšy	AdjInf;
mlħwẓ	AdjInf;
myan_ršte_ay	AdjInf;
axrajy	AdjInf;
nfsany	AdjInf;
taktyky	AdjInf;
emdl	AdjInf;
tyzewš	AdjInf;
prstary	AdjInf;
sxt	AdjInf;
xwš_aŕbal	AdjInf;
tšne	AdjInf;
dawţlbane	AdjInf;
rmzdar	AdjInf;
mŕţ'e	AdjInf;
zwrgyr	AdjInf;
ealywwdy	AdjInf;
mštrk	AdjInf;
mst	AdjInf;
sfyeane	AdjInf;
zšt	AdjInf;
mšrw'e	AdjInf;
āsmany	AdjInf;
rwane	AdjInf;
fraqt	AdjInf;
ābzy	AdjInf;
by_ţbŕe	AdjInf;
mdwn	AdjInf;
astxraj	AdjInf;
mwazy	AdjInf;
āstygmat	AdjInf;
syae	AdjInf;
ħy	AdjInf;
paymal_šde	AdjInf;
zmstane	AdjInf;
ŕdymy	AdjInf;
šnaxty	AdjInf;
afzwn	AdjInf;
mŕtdr	AdjInf;
sale	AdjInf;
xwnsrd	AdjInf;
prxnde	AdjInf;
ħram_gwšt	AdjInf;
namħsws	AdjInf;
dar	AdjInf;
mħtrmane	AdjInf;
madry	AdjInf;
dbstany	AdjInf;
pykrbndy_nšde	AdjInf;
dyktatwry	AdjInf;
xlaŕ	AdjInf;
tblyqy	AdjInf;
damy	AdjInf;
abda'y	AdjInf;
balatr	AdjInf;
qyrmslħ	AdjInf;
xwdpsnd	AdjInf;
flzy	AdjInf;
šamx	AdjInf;
bafte_šde	AdjInf;
xys	AdjInf;
qlţ	AdjInf;
ba'zt	AdjInf;
qm_zde	AdjInf;
mwfwralsrwr	AdjInf;
taze	AdjInf;
ykbare	AdjInf;
dana	AdjInf;
mgapyksly	AdjInf;
xfte	AdjInf;
tjsm	AdjInf;
twjye	AdjInf;
prnšaţ	AdjInf;
pyšrfte	AdjInf;
tnẓymy	AdjInf;
šeyd	AdjInf;
dwdy	AdjInf;
ţflane	AdjInf;
mrtkb	AdjInf;
mnħle	AdjInf;
šyryn	AdjInf;
m'tbr	AdjInf;
mşlħt	AdjInf;
nyme_tmam	AdjInf;
snty	AdjInf;
znane	AdjInf;
by_'ar	AdjInf;
ajtma'y	AdjInf;
mem	AdjInf;
parsy_zban	AdjInf;
klywy	AdjInf;
qyr'ady	AdjInf;
em_traz	AdjInf;
ktan	AdjInf;
qyẓ_ālwd	AdjInf;
mlaym	AdjInf;
bşry	AdjInf;
m'dny	AdjInf;
tmam_'yar	AdjInf;
yktaprstane	AdjInf;
xwdsaxte	AdjInf;
āsmany	AdjInf;
mnedm	AdjInf;
ŕţ'_šde	AdjInf;
mnħşr	AdjInf;
antxabye	AdjInf;
prqrwr	AdjInf;
dmr	AdjInf;
dwdwyy	AdjInf;
šbke_ay	AdjInf;
kwšš	AdjInf;
mrb'	AdjInf;
awkrayny	AdjInf;
wşy	AdjInf;
km_nẓyr	AdjInf;
šgft_angyz	AdjInf;
xwande	AdjInf;
b'd	AdjInf;
ŕšng	AdjInf;
aşyl	AdjInf;
fryb_xwrde	AdjInf;
ħram	AdjInf;
rwqny	AdjInf;
sakt	AdjInf;
tk_mħşwly	AdjInf;
merban	AdjInf;
mlŕb	AdjInf;
mfrwš	AdjInf;
byn_šery	AdjInf;
mħbwb	AdjInf;
sfaly	AdjInf;
mtrtb	AdjInf;
mrdane	AdjInf;
arganyk	AdjInf;
mrŕwm	AdjInf;
mmtn'	AdjInf;
plasmayy	AdjInf;
ŕyasy	AdjInf;
syae	AdjInf;
āgae	AdjInf;
twlydy	AdjInf;
prpyč	AdjInf;
mtzlzl	AdjInf;
skwlar	AdjInf;
aħmŕane	AdjInf;
mškl_saz	AdjInf;
wyže	AdjInf;
taze	AdjInf;
baftny	AdjInf;
ryakar	AdjInf;
rwdrrw	AdjInf;
wswse_gr	AdjInf;
by_mlaħẓe	AdjInf;
by_kyne	AdjInf;
fsŕly	AdjInf;
frbe	AdjInf;
mbark	AdjInf;
xwnyn_šde	AdjInf;
dst_saxte	AdjInf;
jdagane	AdjInf;
anteayy	AdjInf;
syasty	AdjInf;
dm_dsty	AdjInf;
pwsty	AdjInf;
bdny	AdjInf;
brdbar	AdjInf;
anħlaly	AdjInf;
byn_syare_ay	AdjInf;
kbyr	AdjInf;
twjyby	AdjInf;
nwysnde	AdjInf;
anglysy	AdjInf;
sazmandey_šde	AdjInf;
ħlym	AdjInf;
balq	AdjInf;
emgwn	AdjInf;
trk_xwrde_am	AdjInf;
drnde_xw	AdjInf;
qaşb	AdjInf;
mxrb	AdjInf;
nbwy	AdjInf;
daqdar	AdjInf;
kwčwlw	AdjInf;
farsy_zban	AdjInf;
mtmayl	AdjInf;
alktrwnyky	AdjInf;
ħwzwy	AdjInf;
adraky	AdjInf;
ŕdym	AdjInf;
qmxwar	AdjInf;
mdyryt	AdjInf;
ţwly	AdjInf;
xwš_xyal	AdjInf;
dlyr	AdjInf;
naxwrde	AdjInf;
xdmaty	AdjInf;
çmrbxš	AdjInf;
ž´wplytyky	AdjInf;
rwany	AdjInf;
az	AdjInf;
mjbwr	AdjInf;
naward	AdjInf;
rwašde	AdjInf;
xšk_mqz	AdjInf;
qyrqđayy	AdjInf;
qyr_mstŕym	AdjInf;
rwa	AdjInf;
jade_ay	AdjInf;
qyrdastany	AdjInf;
nfys	AdjInf;
by_rng	AdjInf;
rwane	AdjInf;
gšade	AdjInf;
mŕrr	AdjInf;
daqan	AdjInf;
pnbe_ay	AdjInf;
pyš_āmde	AdjInf;
drāmdy	AdjInf;
gre_krde	AdjInf;
šja'	AdjInf;
nmwne	AdjInf;
gnde	AdjInf;
čyre	AdjInf;
ħlwayy	AdjInf;
nžady	AdjInf;
šgft_zde	AdjInf;
frengy	AdjInf;
dywany	AdjInf;
paymal_šde	AdjInf;
byzar	AdjInf;
srsprde	AdjInf;
ţwţy_war	AdjInf;
mtjans	AdjInf;
mrdm_nead	AdjInf;
dlawr	AdjInf;
zrd	AdjInf;
z'frany	AdjInf;
bazšw	AdjInf;
qyrm'tbr	AdjInf;
dštstany	AdjInf;
kađb	AdjInf;
xwaean	AdjInf;
ymny	AdjInf;
šadab	AdjInf;
sfly	AdjInf;
pwdry	AdjInf;
dršt_xw	AdjInf;
mrħle_ay	AdjInf;
tyre_bxt	AdjInf;
xwdpsnd	AdjInf;
arkstral	AdjInf;
naraźy	AdjInf;
mnŕţ'	AdjInf;
ž´wastratžyk	AdjInf;
prnfwđ	AdjInf;
mħmdy	AdjInf;
tmam_nma	AdjInf;
nsye	AdjInf;
drs_xwan	AdjInf;
naškr	AdjInf;
pykarjw	AdjInf;
t'yyn_šde	AdjInf;
ŕlyl	AdjInf;
arzan_ŕymt	AdjInf;
qyrmntẓre_ay	AdjInf;
kmr_črmy	AdjInf;
weaby_mslk	AdjInf;
t´wryk	AdjInf;
nabalq	AdjInf;
gran_sng	AdjInf;
brnde	AdjInf;
ħsn	AdjInf;
tbxyršde	AdjInf;
kantynry	AdjInf;
šmaly	AdjInf;
tndrw	AdjInf;
wyran	AdjInf;
tlfny	AdjInf;
mlyty	AdjInf;
arady	AdjInf;
āby_rng	AdjInf;
klan	AdjInf;
aħmŕane	AdjInf;
a'ţayy	AdjInf;
kwfy	AdjInf;
mšedy	AdjInf;
fŕyr	AdjInf;
mnb'ç	AdjInf;
xrdpđyr	AdjInf;
rswa	AdjInf;
trbyt_šde	AdjInf;
m'trź	AdjInf;
drmany	AdjInf;
salm	AdjInf;
krd#kn	AdjInf;
s'wdy	AdjInf;
km_tħrk	AdjInf;
gwae	AdjInf;
msn	AdjInf;
rd	AdjInf;
danš_bnyan	AdjInf;
frsayšy	AdjInf;
alħady	AdjInf;
xwšwŕt	AdjInf;
ŕewe_ay	AdjInf;
frngy	AdjInf;
rwyarwy	AdjInf;
by_bere	AdjInf;
wŕyħ	AdjInf;
zmxt	AdjInf;
baţle	AdjInf;
bħrany	AdjInf;
tabstany	AdjInf;
mwjwd	AdjInf;
aslam	AdjInf;
źale	AdjInf;
bwmy	AdjInf;
xmyde	AdjInf;
šwerdar	AdjInf;
mŕds	AdjInf;
mwfŕ	AdjInf;
by_wfa	AdjInf;
ħŕyŕt_byn	AdjInf;
by_sym	AdjInf;
xanwadgy	AdjInf;
āswde_xaţr	AdjInf;
dlwaps	AdjInf;
źdfŕr	AdjInf;
nagae	AdjInf;
t'bdy	AdjInf;
xwšgl	AdjInf;
čndrng	AdjInf;
bdrng	AdjInf;
dlbste	AdjInf;
aftade	AdjInf;
afŕy	AdjInf;
mtħde	AdjInf;
swznak	AdjInf;
prçmr	AdjInf;
mnŕrź	AdjInf;
mؤdbane	AdjInf;
eady	AdjInf;
pwynde	AdjInf;
fraz	AdjInf;
mt'ed	AdjInf;
alfbayy	AdjInf;
by_rya	AdjInf;
mħyţy	AdjInf;
arźa	AdjInf;
āškar	AdjInf;
šfaf	AdjInf;
dan_krde	AdjInf;
mħtrme	AdjInf;
kly	AdjInf;
mnkr	AdjInf;
by_pwl	AdjInf;
syamy	AdjInf;
lbny	AdjInf;
mwaje	AdjInf;
dyndar	AdjInf;
by_bşyrt	AdjInf;
jdy	AdjInf;
tmlŕ_āmyz	AdjInf;
ħdaŕl	AdjInf;
mkanyze	AdjInf;
karxane_ay	AdjInf;
anbašte	AdjInf;
blšwyky	AdjInf;
ajteady	AdjInf;
zwdengam	AdjInf;
km_bźa't	AdjInf;
prbrg	AdjInf;
mtŕaźy	AdjInf;
m'lwm	AdjInf;
m'şyt_kar	AdjInf;
zyr	AdjInf;
by_meaba	AdjInf;
mstelk	AdjInf;
msabŕe_ay	AdjInf;
ŕrāny	AdjInf;
šy'y	AdjInf;
aslamy	AdjInf;
ţbŕe_ay	AdjInf;
xwšaynd	AdjInf;
zyarty	AdjInf;
r´alysty	AdjInf;
trkmn	AdjInf;
mtşf	AdjInf;
šyrxwar	AdjInf;
prdrd	AdjInf;
tlafy_jwyane	AdjInf;
dmwkratyk	AdjInf;
zryn	AdjInf;
m'yšty	AdjInf;
mtqyr	AdjInf;
frman_brdar	AdjInf;
krbny	AdjInf;
fźayy	AdjInf;
xakstry	AdjInf;
wyran_knnde	AdjInf;
by_tfawt	AdjInf;
aşwlgra	AdjInf;
sst	AdjInf;
našnas	AdjInf;
aşlħ	AdjInf;
t'bye_šde	AdjInf;
źrwry	AdjInf;
by_nkaħ	AdjInf;
eme_rwze	AdjInf;
rwmrkzy	AdjInf;
āpartmany	AdjInf;
pšmyne	AdjInf;
dyny	AdjInf;
nwštary	AdjInf;
plšt	AdjInf;
karšnasane	AdjInf;
dwwjey	AdjInf;
mdl	AdjInf;
šnwa	AdjInf;
mşnw'	AdjInf;
ħamy	AdjInf;
šady_bxš	AdjInf;
ħram	AdjInf;
ħl_šdny	AdjInf;
by_kran	AdjInf;
nykw	AdjInf;
zndany	AdjInf;
šayste	AdjInf;
nym	AdjInf;
by_rħmane	AdjInf;
awstayy	AdjInf;
by_ms´wlyt	AdjInf;
baast'dad	AdjInf;
jldy	AdjInf;
eyjany	AdjInf;
faktwršde	AdjInf;
meman	AdjInf;
zndgy_sazane	AdjInf;
qryzy	AdjInf;
mtnawb	AdjInf;
nabab	AdjInf;
rsayy	AdjInf;
brangyzannde	AdjInf;
tz´yn	AdjInf;
brgzar	AdjInf;
santy_mantal	AdjInf;
xste_knnde	AdjInf;
qyrantfa'y	AdjInf;
asb_swar	AdjInf;
zyba	AdjInf;
baldar	AdjInf;
tmyz	AdjInf;
aħmŕ	AdjInf;
fwŕ_klywy	AdjInf;
dwstane	AdjInf;
madrmrde	AdjInf;
xrde	AdjInf;
zwd	AdjInf;
ţrfdar	AdjInf;
jabe_ja	AdjInf;
jawydan	AdjInf;
sxyf	AdjInf;
pykre_ay	AdjInf;
prsr't	AdjInf;
ŕjry	AdjInf;
sbz	AdjInf;
namrbwţ	AdjInf;
ź'yf_alnfs	AdjInf;
bymargwne	AdjInf;
qryb_gwne	AdjInf;
jean_šmwl	AdjInf;
čšmy	AdjInf;
ryše_kn	AdjInf;
taze_ward	AdjInf;
karāzmwde	AdjInf;
şamt	AdjInf;
yewdye	AdjInf;
sye	AdjInf;
naāram	AdjInf;
able_prwr	AdjInf;
nyayšgrane	AdjInf;
yadgary	AdjInf;
sxawtmndane	AdjInf;
awl	AdjInf;
lsany	AdjInf;
yksan	AdjInf;
syţre_jw	AdjInf;
āqšte	AdjInf;
makwl	AdjInf;
prmħtwa	AdjInf;
mkrwe	AdjInf;
mźrwb	AdjInf;
şn'ty	AdjInf;
rfte	AdjInf;
jaaftade	AdjInf;
fyrwzgwn	AdjInf;
a'jab_āwr	AdjInf;
šyţan	AdjInf;
wagđaršde	AdjInf;
xlŕ_šde	AdjInf;
mnħşr	AdjInf;
mst'ml	AdjInf;
xyantkar	AdjInf;
a'ly_ħźrty	AdjInf;
se_layy	AdjInf;
mdrse_saz	AdjInf;
jasws	AdjInf;
ħmle_knnde	AdjInf;
bdŕwly	AdjInf;
šgft	AdjInf;
mand#man	AdjInf;
šrmnde	AdjInf;
šl	AdjInf;
knf	AdjInf;
sygary	AdjInf;
prtab_šde	AdjInf;
abtda´y	AdjInf;
āmwznde	AdjInf;
ţby	AdjInf;
mwaşlaty	AdjInf;
abzary	AdjInf;
kary	AdjInf;
